Wisconsin, session 2025, SB77.
do enact as follows:SB77,11Section 1. 943.10 (1m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB77,2,52943.10 (1m) (intro.) Whoever intentionally enters any of the following places 3without the consent of the person in lawful possession and with intent to steal or 4commit a felony or a violation of s. 940.19 (1) or 940.195 (1) in such place is guilty of 5a Class F felony:SB77,2,66